West Virginia, session 2025, HB2960.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO STATE ROADS. §17-9-1. Snow removal pilot program. (a) The Legislature finds that snow removal in the state – particularly on secondary roads in Monongalia County and Preston County – has not been dependable, thereby providing a hardship on the citizens of West Virginia.(b) The Division of Highways shall provide snow removal for all 55 counties of the State of West Virginia, with roads being prioritized into four categories: (1) Priority One Routes: Interstate, Expressway, National Highway System, and all other United States and West Virginia routes with some Priority One routes also including high-traffic county routes;(2) Priority Two Routes: All other school bus routes that are not considered Priority One;(3) Priority Three Routes: Remaining routes, not including park and forest routes; and(4) Priority Four Routes: Park and forest routes.  (c) The Division of Highways shall establish a two-year pilot program to issue Requests for Proposals for multiple vendors to provide snow removal for West Virginia Division of Highways District Four's secondary roads in Monongalia County and Preston County.(d) The Division of Highways shall have sole discretion in identifying the specific roads requiring maintenance under this pilot program.(e) No vendor employed to remove snow and ice from the secondary roads in Monongalia County and Preston County shall be afforded immunity from legal liability owing to any damage it may cause.(f) The Commissioner of the Division of Highways may terminate any contract related to snow removal with 30 days' notice for cause.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home